Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 87

Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act

12-87-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act”.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-102. Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Disaster relief organization” means an entity that provides emergency or disaster relief services that include health or veterinary services provided by volunteer health practitioners and that:

is designated or recognized as a provider of those services pursuant to a disaster response and recovery plan adopted by an agency of the federal government or the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management; or

regularly plans and conducts its activities in coordination with an agency of the federal government or the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management.

“Emergency” means an event or condition that is a disaster emergency under § 12-75-107 or § 12-75-108.

“Emergency declaration” means a declaration of emergency issued by a person authorized to do so under the laws of this state, executive order or proclamation of the Governor, or § 12-75-107 or § 12-75-108.

“Emergency Management Assistance Compact” means the interstate compact approved by Congress by Public Law No. 104-321, 110 Stat. 3877, codified at § 12-49-401 et seq.

“Entity” means a person other than an individual.

“Health facility” means an entity licensed under the laws of this or another state to provide health or veterinary services.

“Health practitioner” means an individual licensed under the laws of this or another state to provide health or veterinary services.

“Health services” means the provision of treatment, care, advice or guidance, or other services, or supplies, related to the health or death of individuals or human populations, to the extent necessary to respond to an emergency, including:

The following, concerning the physical or mental condition or functional status of an individual or affecting the structure or function of the body:

preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, maintenance, or palliative care; and

counseling, assessment, procedures, or other services;

Sale or dispensing of a drug, a device, equipment, or another item to an individual in accordance with a prescription; and

Funeral, cremation, cemetery, or other mortuary services.

“Host entity” means an entity operating in this state which uses volunteer health practitioners to respond to an emergency.

“License” means authorization by a state to engage in health or veterinary services that are unlawful without the authorization. The term includes authorization under the laws of this state to an individual to provide health or veterinary services based upon a national certification issued by a public or private entity.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Scope of practice” means the extent of the authorization to provide health or veterinary services granted to a health practitioner by a license issued to the practitioner in the state in which the principal part of the practitioner's services are rendered, including any conditions imposed by the licensing authority.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Veterinary services” means the provision of treatment, care, advice or guidance, or other services, or supplies, related to the health or death of an animal or to animal populations, to the extent necessary to respond to an emergency, including:

diagnosis, treatment, or prevention of an animal disease, injury, or other physical or mental condition by the prescription, administration, or dispensing of vaccine, medicine, surgery, or therapy;

use of a procedure for reproductive management; and

monitoring and treatment of animal populations for diseases that have spread or demonstrate the potential to spread to humans.

“Volunteer health practitioner” means a health practitioner who provides health or veterinary services, whether or not the practitioner receives compensation for those services. The term does not include a practitioner who receives compensation pursuant to a preexisting employment relationship with a host entity or affiliate which requires the practitioner to provide health services in this state, unless the practitioner is not a resident of this state and is employed by a disaster relief organization providing services in this state while an emergency declaration is in effect.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-103. Applicability to volunteer health practitioners.

This chapter applies to volunteer health practitioners registered with a registration system that complies with §12-87-105 and who provide health or veterinary services in this state for a host entity while an emergency declaration is in effect.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-104. Regulation of services during emergency.

While an emergency declaration is in effect, the Department of Health may limit, restrict, or otherwise regulate:

the duration of practice by volunteer health practitioners;

the geographical areas in which volunteer health practitioners may practice;

the types of volunteer health practitioners who may practice; and

any other matters necessary to coordinate effectively the provision of health or veterinary services during the emergency.

An order issued pursuant to subsection (a) may take effect immediately, without prior notice or comment, and is not a rule within the meaning of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

A host entity that uses volunteer health practitioners to provide health or veterinary services in this state shall:

consult and coordinate its activities with the Department of Health to the extent practicable to provide for the efficient and effective use of volunteer health practitioners; and

comply with any laws other than this chapter relating to the management of emergency health or veterinary services, including the Emergency Medical Services Revolving Fund Act, § 20-13-101 et seq.

be capable of confirming the accuracy of information concerning whether a health practitioner is licensed and in good standing before health services or veterinary services are provided under this chapter; and

be designated by the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management as a registration system for purposes of this chapter.

The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management may consider and may approve a request for the designation of a registration system submitted by a disaster relief organization, licensing board, national or regional association of licensing boards or healthcare practitioners, health facility that provides comprehensive inpatient and outpatient healthcare services, or host entity, and may on its own initiative approve registration systems established by this state or other states funded through the United States Department of Health and Human Services under Section 3197 of the Public Health Services Act, 42 U.S.C. § 247d, or by medical reserve corps units formed under Section 2801 of the Public Health Services Act, 42 U.S.C. § 300hh.

While an emergency declaration is in effect, the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, a person authorized to act on behalf of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, or a host entity, may confirm whether volunteer health practitioners utilized in this state are registered with a registration system that complies with subsection (a). Confirmation is limited to obtaining identities of the practitioners from the system and determining whether the system indicates that the practitioners are licensed and in good standing.

Upon request of a person in this state authorized under subsection (b), or a similarly authorized person in another state, a registration system located in this state shall notify the person of the identities of volunteer health practitioners and whether the practitioners are licensed and in good standing.

A host entity is not required to use the services of a volunteer health practitioner even if the practitioner is registered with a registration system that indicates that the practitioner is licensed and in good standing.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Subdivision (a)(4) of this section significantly differs from Section 5(a)(4) of the official version of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act drafted by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.

“Credentialing” means obtaining, verifying, and assessing the qualifications of a health practitioner to provide treatment, care, or services in or for a health facility.

“Privileging” means the authorizing by an appropriate authority, such as a governing body, of a health practitioner to provide specific treatment, care, or services at a health facility subject to limits based on factors that include license, education, training, experience, competence, health status, and specialized skill.

A volunteer health practitioner does not engage in unauthorized practice unless the practitioner has reason to know of any limitation, modification, or restriction under this section or that a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide the services. A volunteer health practitioner has reason to know of a limitation, modification, or restriction or that a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide a service if:

the practitioner knows the limitation, modification, or restriction exists or that a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide the service; or

from all the facts and circumstances known to the practitioner at the relevant time, a reasonable person would conclude that the limitation, modification, or restriction exists or that a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would not be permitted to provide the service.

In addition to the authority granted by law of this state other than this chapter to regulate the conduct of health practitioners, a licensing board or other disciplinary authority in this state:

may impose administrative sanctions upon a health practitioner licensed in this state for conduct outside of this state in response to an out-of-state emergency;

may impose administrative sanctions upon a practitioner not licensed in this state for conduct in this state in response to an in-state emergency; and

shall report any administrative sanctions imposed upon a practitioner licensed in another state to the appropriate licensing board or other disciplinary authority in any other state in which the practitioner is known to be licensed.

In determining whether to impose administrative sanctions under subsection (f), a licensing board or other disciplinary authority shall consider the circumstances in which the conduct took place, including any exigent circumstances, and the practitioner's scope of practice, education, training, experience, and specialized skill.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section differs from Section 9 of the official version of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act drafted by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. This section includes a reference to the Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, §12-76-101 et seq., that is not in the official version. However, the Legislative Note to the official version indicates that a state should reference any emergency compacts in which the state is a party.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-105. Volunteer health practitioner registration systems.

To qualify as a volunteer health practitioner registration system, a system must:

accept applications for the registration of volunteer health practitioners before or during an emergency;

include information about the licensure and good standing of health practitioners which is accessible by authorized persons;

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-106. Recognition of volunteer health practitioners licensed in other states.

While an emergency declaration is in effect, a volunteer health practitioner, registered with a registration system that complies with §12-87-105 and licensed and in good standing in the state upon which the practitioner's registration is based, may practice in this state to the extent authorized by this chapter as if the practitioner were licensed in this state.

A volunteer health practitioner qualified under subsection (a) is not entitled to the protections of this chapter if the practitioner is licensed in more than one state and any license of the practitioner is suspended, revoked, or subject to an agency order limiting or restricting practice privileges, or has been voluntarily terminated under threat of sanction.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-107. No effect on credentialing and privileging.

In this section:

This chapter does not affect credentialing or privileging standards of a health facility and does not preclude a health facility from waiving or modifying those standards while an emergency declaration is in effect.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-108. Provision of volunteer health or veterinary services — Administrative sanctions.

Subject to subsections (b) and (c), a volunteer health practitioner shall adhere to the scope of practice for a similarly licensed practitioner established by the licensing provisions, practice acts, or other laws of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), this chapter does not authorize a volunteer health practitioner to provide services that are outside the practitioner's scope of practice, even if a similarly licensed practitioner in this state would be permitted to provide the services.

The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management may modify or restrict the health or veterinary services that volunteer health practitioners may provide pursuant to this chapter. An order under this subsection may take effect immediately, without prior notice or comment, and is not a rule within the meaning of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

A host entity may restrict the health or veterinary services that a volunteer health practitioner may provide pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-109. Relation to other laws.

This chapter does not limit rights, privileges, or immunities provided to volunteer health practitioners by laws other than this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), this chapter does not affect requirements for the use of health practitioners pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance Compact.

The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance Compact and the Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, §12-76-101 et seq., may incorporate into the emergency forces of this state volunteer health practitioners who are not officers or employees of this state, a political subdivision of this state, or a municipality or other local government within this state.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-110. Regulatory authority.

The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management may promulgate rules to implement this chapter. In doing so, the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management shall consult with and consider the recommendations of the entity established to coordinate the implementation of the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, and the Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, §12-76-101 et seq. and shall also consult with and consider rules promulgated by similarly empowered agencies in other states to promote uniformity of application of this chapter and make the emergency response systems in the various states reasonably compatible.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section differs from Section 10 of the official version of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act drafted by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. This section includes a reference to the Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, §12-76-101 et seq., that is not in the official version. However, the Legislative Note to the official version indicates that a state should reference any emergency compacts in which the state is a party.

12-87-111. Limitations on civil liability for volunteer health practitioners.

Subject to subsection (b), a volunteer health practitioner who receives compensation of five hundred dollars ($500) or less per year for providing health or veterinary services pursuant to this chapter is not liable for damages for an act or omission of the practitioner in providing those services. Reimbursement of, or allowance for, reasonable expenses, or continuation of salary or other remuneration while on leave, is not compensation under this subsection.

This section does not limit the liability of a volunteer health practitioner for:

willful misconduct or wanton, grossly negligent, reckless, or criminal conduct;

an intentional tort;

breach of contract;

a claim asserted by a host entity or by an entity located in this or another state which employs or uses the services of the practitioner; or

an act or omission relating to the operation of a motor vehicle, vessel, aircraft, or other vehicle.

A person that, pursuant to this chapter, operates, uses, or relies upon information provided by a volunteer health practitioner registration system is not liable for damages for an act or omission relating to that operation, use, or reliance unless the act or omission is an intentional tort or is willful misconduct or wanton, grossly negligent, reckless, or criminal conduct.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section adopts Alternative B of Section 11 of the official version of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act drafted by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. An optional subsection (d) in Alternative B was not adopted.

the practitioner is not otherwise eligible for such benefits for the injury or death under the law of this or another state; and

the practitioner, or in the case of death the practitioner's personal representative, elects coverage under the workers' compensation or occupational disease law of this state by making a claim under that law; and

the practitioner is acting under the control or direction of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, the Governor, or another state government agency.

Benefits payable for the injury or death of a registered volunteer health practitioner covered by this chapter shall be limited to the provisions of the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq. Benefits are payable if the injury or death occurred while the person was:

actually engaged in emergency service duties, either during training or during a period of emergency; and

under the supervision and instruction and subject to the order or control of, or serving pursuant to a request of, the Governor, the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, or the chief executive officer of a county or local government unit making use of registered volunteer health practitioners.

The remedy provided in this section shall be the exclusive remedy as against the state and political subdivisions of the state.

For the purpose of workers' compensation coverage in cases of injury to or death of an individual, a registered volunteer health practitioner is deemed a state employee and shall receive compensation and a survivor of a registered volunteer health practitioner shall receive death benefits in the same manner as a regular state employee for injury or death arising out of and in the course of activities as registered volunteer health practitioners.

If the registered volunteer health practitioner was under the order or control of a state agency when injured or killed, compensation and benefits shall be charged against the experience rate of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management and paid from the appropriate state workers' compensation fund.

For the purpose of subdivision (d)(3) of this section, the weekly compensation benefits for a registered volunteer health practitioner who receives no monetary compensation for services rendered as a worker under this chapter shall be calculated based upon the wages received from his or her regular or usual employment, the same as a regular state employee, with respect to injury, disability, or death.

The reimbursement of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or less for out-of-pocket expenses for gasoline, oil, uniforms, required equipment, or similar expenses incurred in response to an emergency situation shall not be construed to be monetary compensation for the registered volunteer health practitioner.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section significantly differs from Section 12 of the official version of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act drafted by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. Subdivision (b)(3) of this section is not in the official version, subsection (c) of this section does not match the subsection (c) in the official version, and subsection (d) of this section is not in the official version. Some of these differences may be attributed to the Legislative Notes to the official version indicating that states should clarify how this section fits within existing state workers' compensation or occupational disease laws.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-112. Workers' compensation coverage.

In this section, “injury” means a physical or mental injury or disease for which an employee of this state who is injured or contracts the disease in the course of the employee's employment would be entitled to benefits under the workers' compensation or occupational disease law of this state.

A registered volunteer health practitioner who dies or is injured as the result of providing health or veterinary services pursuant to this chapter is deemed to be an employee of this state for the purpose of receiving benefits for the death or injury under the workers' compensation or occupational disease law of this state if:

The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management shall certify to the Public Employee Claims Division of the State Insurance Department the names and registration information for each registered volunteer health practitioner working in this state under this chapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-113. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-114. [Reserved.]

This chapter takes effect October 1, 2009.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 432, § 1.

12-87-115. Effective date.